Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 5. Education for Children With Disabilities.

Administrative Code. —

For education for children with disabilities and gifted children, see 4 AAC 52.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 337 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 700 et seq.

Tort liability for misclassification or wrongful placement of student in special education program. 33 ALR4th 1166.

Sec. 14.30.180.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

to

provide an appropriate public education for each child with a disability in the state who is at least three years of age but less than 22 years of age;

allow procedures and actions necessary to comply with the requirements of federal law, including 20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482 (Individuals with Disabilities Education Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 144 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 20 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For program establishment, see 4 AAC 52, art. 1.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

For program administration: gifted children, see 4 AAC 52, art. 3.

For pre-elementary (early childhood) school, see 4 AAC 60.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482” for “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1487” in paragraph (2).

Sec. 14.30.185.
Programs shall be established. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.30.186.
Coverage; regulations.

Special education and related services shall be provided by

a borough or city school district for a child with a disability residing within the district;

the board of a regional educational attendance area operating a school in the area for a child with a disability residing in the area served by the school;

the borough, city school district, or regional educational attendance area in which a treatment institution, as that term is defined in AS

47.14.990

, juvenile detention facility or juvenile treatment facility, as those terms are defined in AS

47.12.990

, or a correctional facility is located for a child with a disability placed at the facility;

a state boarding school established under AS 14.16 for a child with a disability enrolled at a state boarding school; or

a school district that provides a statewide correspondence study program for a child with a disability who is enrolled in the program.

[Repealed, § 41 ch 67 SLA 2001.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 147 SLA 1984.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 147 SLA 1984.]

If the parent of a child with a disability elects to educate the child as allowed under AS

14.30.010(b)

, the child may not be compelled to receive the special education and related services provided under AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

.

The department shall, by regulation, establish standards for the allocation of financial responsibilities and the coordination of the provision of special education and related services among the educational agencies listed in (a) of this section when more than one educational agency is responsible for providing those services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1966; am § 46 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 46 SLA 1970; am §§ 2, 3 ch 144 SLA 1970; am §§ 23, 24 ch 124 SLA 1975; am §§ 2, 3, 19 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1993; am §§ 3 — 5, 41 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 10 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a)(3), substituted “a treatment institution, as that term is defined in AS

47.14.990

, juvenile detention facility or juvenile treatment facility as those terms are defined in AS

47.12.990

, or a correctional facility” for “a treatment facility or a correctional or youth detention facility” following “area in which”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57(b), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (a) of this section applies to minors subject to AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22, ch. 16, SLA 2021, and AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (a) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Sec. 14.30.190.
Establishment of standards by Department of Health and Social Services. [Repealed, § 4 ch 144 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.30.191.
Educational evaluation and placement.

A school district shall obtain the written informed consent of the child’s parent before an initial evaluation or placement of a child with a disability in a program of special education and related services.

After initial placement in a program of special education and related services and not less than once every three years for as long as the child is assigned to the program, a child with a disability shall receive an educational evaluation.

Before a school district initiates or refuses a change in the placement or educational program of a child with a disability, the district shall notify the child’s parent.

Upon completion of an evaluation or reevaluation under this section, the school district shall provide to the parent of each child evaluated under this section an opportunity to participate in the determination of the

child’s eligibility for special education and related services; and

educational placement of the child if the child is determined to be eligible for special education and related services.

A parent may obtain an independent educational evaluation by choosing a person from a list provided by the district or by choosing a person by agreement between the parent and the school district, at the expense of the school district, if the parent disagrees with an evaluation obtained by the school district. The school district may initiate a hearing to show that its evaluation is appropriate. If the hearing officer determines that the evaluation is appropriate, the school district may not be required to pay for the independent educational evaluation.

If the parent obtains an independent educational evaluation at private expense, the results of the evaluation

must be considered by the school district in a decision made with respect to the provision of an appropriate public education to the child;

may be presented as evidence at a hearing regarding the child.

If a hearing officer requests an independent educational evaluation as part of a hearing, the school district shall pay for the evaluation.

A school district shall provide written notice of its decision under this section to the parent of the child. The notice must include a description of the procedural safeguards available to the parent and child under federal law.

In this section, “hearing” means a due process hearing under AS

14.30.193

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 144 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 147 SLA 1984; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 77 SLA 1993; am §§ 6 — 10 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.193.
Due process hearing.

A school district or a parent of a child with a disability may request a due process hearing on any issue related to identification, evaluation, or educational placement of the child, or the provision of a free, appropriate, public education to the child. A request is made by providing written notice to the other party to the hearing. A parent shall make a request for a due process hearing under this section not later than 12 months after the date that the school district provides the parent with written notice of the decision with which the parent disagrees. A school district shall make its request for a due process hearing in accordance with the time limit established by the department by regulation.

If a due process hearing is requested by either a school district or a parent, the school district shall contact the department to request appointment of a hearing officer. The department shall select a hearing officer through a random selection process, from a list maintained by the department under (g) of this section. Within five working days after receipt of the request, the department shall provide to the school district and the parent a notice of appointment, including the name and a statement of qualifications, of the hearing officer that the department determines is available to conduct the hearing.

The school district and the parent each have the right to reject, without stating a reason, one hearing officer appointed under this section. The rejecting party shall notify the department of that rejection in writing within five days after receipt of the department’s notice of appointment. If a hearing officer is rejected under this subsection, the department shall, within five working days after receipt of the written rejection, provide a notice of appointment, including the name and a statement of qualifications, of another hearing officer that the department determines is available to conduct the hearing. Each appointment is subject to a right of rejection under this subsection by a party who has not previously rejected an appointment.

After a hearing officer is appointed and the time for rejection under (c) of this section has expired, the hearing officer shall immediately inform the parent and the school district of the availability of the mediation process provided under AS

14.30.194

and encourage use of that process to attempt to resolve the disagreement between the parent and the school district. If the mediation process does not result in settlement of all of the issues, the hearing officer shall conduct a hearing in conformance with the requirements of federal law, including 34 C.F.R. 300.511 — 513. After the hearing is completed, the hearing officer shall issue a written decision that

upholds the school district’s decision; or

overturns the school district’s decision with specific instructions for modification of the identification, evaluation, educational placement, or provision of the education program by the district.

A hearing officer’s decision under this section is final and binding on the school district and parent unless appealed under (f) of this section. Notwithstanding a decision by the hearing officer, a child may not be evaluated, placed, transferred, or compelled to receive special education or related services from the school district until the period for filing an appeal under (f) of this section has expired or, if an appeal is filed, until the appellate review process has been completed.

A hearing officer’s decision under this section is a final administrative order, subject to appeal to the superior court for review in the manner provided under AS

44.62.560

.

The department shall maintain a list of qualified hearing officers and shall provide for qualification of hearing officers through a training program that is open to all individuals who meet the criteria set by the department by regulation. The list of qualified hearing officers shall be maintained as a public record.

For purposes of this section, a student with a disability aged 18 — 21 has the same rights and obligations under this section as a parent of a child with a disability.

History.

(§ 8 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 11 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 21 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “34 C.F.R. 300.511 — 513” for “34 C.F.R. 300.507 — 509” in the second sentence of subsection (d).

Sec. 14.30.194.
Mediation.

The department shall, by regulation, establish and implement a voluntary mediation process in conformance with the requirements of federal law, including 34 C.F.R. 300.506. The department shall encourage the use of mediation for settlement of disputes under AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

.

The department shall

maintain a list of individuals who are qualified mediators knowledgeable in the federal and state statutes and regulations relating to the provision of special education and related services; and

provide for qualification of mediators through a training program that is open to all individuals who meet the criteria set by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 12 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.195.
Hearings. [Repealed, § 41 ch 67 SLA 2001.]

Secs. 14.30.200 — 14.30.220.
Eligibility; budget; forfeiture of right to reimbursement. [Repealed, § 5 ch 70 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 14.30.230.
Special education. [Repealed, § 6 ch 144 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.30.231.
Advisory panel.

The Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education established under AS 47.80 shall serve as the state advisory panel, the function of which is to provide information and guidance for the development of appropriate programs of special education and related services for children with disabilities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 144 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 13 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 6, ch. 13, SLA 1992, and AS

01.05.031

, “Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education” was substituted for “Governor’s Council for the Handicapped and Gifted.”

Administrative Code. —

For program establishment, see 4 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 14.30.235.
Withdrawal of consent.

If under a provision of this chapter the consent of the parent is required, the parent may withdraw the parent’s consent.

History.

(§ 11 ch 77 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.240.
Supervisor. [Repealed, § 5 ch 70 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 14.30.250.
Teacher qualifications.

A person may not be employed as a teacher of children with disabilities unless that person possesses a valid teacher certificate and, in addition, the training that the department requires by regulation.

History.

(§ 9 ch 120 SLA 1959; am § 47 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.255.
Administrator qualifications.

A person may not be employed as an administrator of a program of special education and related services unless that person possesses a valid administrative certificate and, in addition, such training as the department may require by regulation.

History.

(§ 8 ch 147 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For certification of professional teachers, see 4 AAC 12.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.260.
Exception to qualifications. [Repealed, § 19 ch 147 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 14.30.270.
Substitutes.

AS

14.30.250

does not prohibit the employment of a person, otherwise qualified to serve as a substitute teacher, to serve as a substitute teacher of children with disabilities.

History.

(§ 12 ch 120 SLA 1959; am § 49 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Sec. 14.30.272.
Procedural safeguards.

A school district shall inform the parent of a child with a disability of the right

to review the child’s educational record;

to review evaluation tests and procedures;

to refuse to permit evaluation or a change in the child’s educational placement;

to be informed of the results of evaluation;

to obtain an independent evaluation by choosing a person from a list provided by the school district or by choosing a person by agreement between the parent and school district;

to request a due process hearing;

to appeal a hearing officer’s decision; and

to give consent or deny access to others to the child’s educational record.

The department shall establish, by regulation, impartial procedures for a school district to follow for due process hearings to comply with requirements necessary to participate in federal grant-in-aid programs, including 20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482 (Individuals with Disabilities Education Act).

History.

(§ 10 ch 147 SLA 1984; am §§ 12, 13 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 16 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 22 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482” for “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1487” in subsection (b).

Sec. 14.30.274.
Identification of children with disabilities.

Each school district shall establish and implement written procedures to ensure that all children with disabilities under the age of 22 for whom the agency is responsible under AS

14.30.186

to provide special education and related services are identified and located for the purpose of establishing their need for special education and related services.

History.

(§ 10 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 17 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.276.
Least restrictive environment.

Each school district shall ensure that, to the maximum extent appropriate, children with disabilities, including children in public or private institutions or other care facilities, are educated with children who are not children with disabilities and that special classes, separate schooling, or other removal of children with disabilities from the regular educational environment occurs only when the nature or severity of the child’s disability is such that education in regular classes with the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily.

History.

(§ 10 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 18 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.278.
Individualized education program; transition services.

A school district shall develop an individualized education program for special education and related services for each eligible child with a disability. The plan must be completed not later than 30 days after the determination of the child’s eligibility. Each individualized education program shall be developed and periodically reviewed and revised as necessary in conformance with federal requirements, including 34 C.F.R. 300.320 — 328.

When providing transition services as defined in 20 U.S.C. 1401(34) to a child with a disability who is over 15 years of age as part of a program of special education and related services under AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

, a school district’s primary objective and preferred outcome is to help the child become gainfully employed in an integrated workplace where individuals with disabilities work with and alongside of individuals without disabilities, or become enrolled in postsecondary education.

In this section, “gainfully employed” means employed full time or part time within one year of leaving high school.

History.

(§ 10 ch 147 SLA 1984; am §§ 14, 15 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 19 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 23 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “34 C.F.R. 300.320 — 328” for “34 C.F.R. 300.340 — 350” at the end of the section.

The 2014 amendment, effective August 27, 2014, added (b) and (c).

Sec. 14.30.280.
Psychologist qualifications. [Repealed, § 19 ch 147 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 14.30.285.
Transfers of children with disabilities.

The department shall institute a statewide program for the education of children with disabilities to ensure that whenever possible children are educated in the state at locations in or near their resident school district.

An identified child with a disability may be sent to an educational program or residential school outside the child’s community or school district if the child resides in a community or school district where an appropriate educational program cannot reasonably be made available and if the school district determines that provision of special education and related services in another educational program or residential school is appropriate. If the school district approves the enrollment of a child with a disability in another educational program or residential school outside the child’s community or school district and the child is enrolled, the child’s education expenses shall be paid as follows:

except as otherwise provided by (2) of this subsection, the sending district shall pay all costs associated with the transfer;

the department may provide financial assistance to the school district for a child’s education provided for in (1) of this subsection under regulations adopted by the department.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 147 SLA 1984.]

For the purposes of this section a child’s education expenses are limited to the actual cost of necessary care, transportation, and special education and related services, including room and board.

The educational assessment of a child with a disability that indicates that the educational program that is locally available is inappropriate for the needs of the child must conform to the standards set out in AS

14.30.191

.

A school district shall obtain informed consent of the child’s parent before a child may be transferred to a school outside the district in which the child resides.

The withholding of informed consent by a parent for the transfer of a child with a disability under this section does not relieve a school district of the obligation to provide special education and related services to the child.

The department shall make available to school districts an electronic system for managing student information and tracking records relating to individualized education programs for children with disabilities. The system must, to the extent permitted by federal law, allow school districts to transfer special education records for a student when the student transfers to a different school district. If the governing body of a school district elects to use the system selected by the department, the department shall provide the school district with the system, including any software necessary to implement the system, at no charge to the school district. The department may not require a school district to use the system selected by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 46 SLA 1966; am §§ 8, 9 ch 144 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 79 SLA 1974; am §§ 11 — 13, 19 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1986; am §§ 16, 17 ch 77 SLA 1993; am §§ 20 — 24 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 7 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 28, 2018, added (h).

Sec. 14.30.290.
Purposes of appropriations. [Repealed, § 5 ch 70 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 14.30.295.
Special education outside state. [Repealed, § 4 ch 79 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 14.30.300.
Nonresident apportionment. [Repealed, § 5 ch 70 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 14.30.305.
State support of programs for children hospitalized or confined to their homes.

A child who is hospitalized or confined to home and who receives at least 10 hours of special education and related services per week may be counted as a pupil in average daily membership when computing state support under the public school funding program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 46 SLA 1966; am § 14 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 29 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For provisions of the public school funding program, see AS 14.17.

Sec. 14.30.310.
Hospitalized and homebound children. [Repealed, § 5 ch 70 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 14.30.315.
State support of programs for gifted children. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998; § 41 ch 67 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 14.30.320.
Reimbursement for hospitalized or homebound children. [Repealed, § 5 ch 70 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 14.30.325.
Surrogate parents.

The department shall by regulation provide for the appointment of surrogate parents to represent a child with a disability in matters relating to the provision of an appropriate public education.

A surrogate parent is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission committed in the surrogate parent’s official capacity, except that a surrogate parent may be liable for civil damages as a result of gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 15 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 25 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.330.
Application for enrollment. [Repealed, § 19 ch 147 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 14.30.335.
Eligibility for federal funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

, the department may do all things necessary to qualify for federal funds that are available to the state for the education of children with disabilities.

History.

(§ 16 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 26 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For program establishment, see 4 AAC 52, art. 1.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.340.
Provision of special education in a private school, home, or hospital setting.

If a parent of a child with a disability enrolls the child in a private school, including a religious school, at the parent’s expense or teaches the child at home, the school district in which the child resides shall make special education and related services available in conformance with federal requirements, including 34 C.F.R. 300.130 — 148. A parent teaching the parent’s child at home may refuse special education and related services for the child.

If a physician certifies in writing, and if the child’s individualized education program under AS

14.30.278

provides that a child’s bodily, mental, or emotional condition does not permit attendance at a school and the child’s parents do not elect to teach the child at home as permitted under AS

14.30.010(b)

, the school district in which the child is located shall enroll the child in public school and provide the child with special education and related services in conformance with the child’s individualized education program at the child’s home or at a medical treatment facility.

History.

(§ 18 ch 120 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 125 SLA 1961; am § 18 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 27 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 24 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “34 C.F.R. 300.130 — 148” for “34 C.F.R. 300.450 — 462” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Sec. 14.30.345.
Regulations.
[Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.30.347.
Transportation of children with disabilities.

When transportation is required to be provided as a related service, a child with a disability shall be transported with children who are not children with disabilities if the district provides transportation to children in the district, except when the nature of the physical or mental disability is such that it is in the best interest of the child with a disability, as provided in the child’s individualized education program, that the child be transported separately. State reimbursement for transportation of children with disabilities shall be as provided for transportation of all other pupils except that eligibility for reimbursement is not subject to restriction based on the minimum distance between the school and the residence of the child with a disability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1976; am § 17 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 19 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 30 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 28 ch 67 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in the last sentence, “exceptional” was deleted to correct a manifest error in § 28, ch. 67, SLA 2001.

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.350.
Definitions.

In AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

,

“appropriate education” means personalized instruction with sufficient support services to permit a child to benefit educationally from the instruction;

“child with a disability” means a child with one or more of the following:

intellectual disability;

learning disabilities;

emotional disturbance;

deafness;

deaf-blindness;

hearing impairment;

orthopedic impairment;

other health impairment;

speech or language impairment;

visual impairment;

multiple disabilities;

early childhood development delay;

autism;

traumatic brain injury;

developmental disability;

“due process hearing” means a hearing conducted under AS

14.30.193

;

“educational records” means those files, documents, records, and other material that contain information directly related to a student and are maintained by a school district or a person acting for a school district; the term “educational records” does not include the personnel records of the school district, maintained in the normal course of business, that relate exclusively to a person’s capacity as an employee, or other records as designated by the department in regulation;

“informed consent” means that

a child’s parent has been fully informed, in the parent’s native language or other mode of communication, of all information relevant to the activity for which consent is sought;

the parent understands and agrees in writing to the carrying out of the activity for which the parent’s consent is sought;

the consent describes that activity and lists any records that will be released and to whom; and

the parent understands that the granting of consent is voluntary on the part of the parent and may be revoked at any time;

“parent” means a

child’s natural or adoptive parent;

child’s guardian, but not the state if the child is in the legal custody of the state;

person who is acting in the place of a child’s natural or adoptive parent, such as a grandparent or stepparent with whom the child lives, or a person who is legally responsible for the child’s welfare; and

child’s surrogate parent who has been appointed under AS

14.30.325

;

“related services” means services described in 34 C.F.R. 300.34;

“school district” means a borough school district, a city school district, a regional educational attendance area, a state boarding school, and the state centralized correspondence study program;

“special education” means an educational program described in 34 C.F.R. 300.39.

History.

(§ 2 ch 120 SLA 1959; am §§ 5, 6 ch 81 SLA 1965; am §§ 13, 14 ch 144 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 119 SLA 1981; am § 18 ch 147 SLA 1984; am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992; am §§ 20 — 24 ch 77 SLA 1993; am §§ 29 — 34, 41 ch 67 SLA 2001; am §§ 25, 26 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Renumbered in 1992, 1993, and 2001 to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “34 C.F.R. 300.34” for “34 C.F.R. 300.24” in paragraph (7) and “34 C.F.R. 300.39” for “34 C.F.R. 300.26” in paragraph (9).

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (2)(A), substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation”; added (2)(O).